Utah statutes.
63A-9-501.   Complaints about misuse or illegal operation of state vehicles
-- Disposition.
(1)  The division shall refer complaints from the public about misuse or
illegal operation of state vehicles to the agency that is the owner or lessor
of the vehicle.
(2)  Each agency head or his designee shall investigate all complaints about
misuse or illegal operation of state vehicles and shall discipline each
employee that is found to have misused or illegally operated a vehicle by
following the procedures set forth in the rules adopted by the Department of
Human Resource Management as authorized by Section 67-19-18.
(3) (a)  Each agency shall report the findings of each investigation conducted
as well as any action taken as a result of the investigation to the directors
of the Divisions of Fleet Operations and Risk Management.
(b)  Misuse or illegal operation of state vehicles may result in suspension or
revocation of state vehicle driving privileges as governed in rule.
